Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1083
Local governing body; agreements authorized.

Any local governing body authorized to impose a service surcharge may enter into an agreement directly with a service supplier of 911 service or may contract and cooperate with any public safety agency, with other states or their political subdivisions, or with any association or corporation for the administration of 911 service as provided by law.

Laws 1990, LB 240, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1008;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 241;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-440;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 65.